Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202538-1510
Licensed hearing instrument specialist; services; restriction; applicability of act.

(1) A licensed hearing instrument specialist shall only provide services to an individual who is eighteen years of age or older unless prohibited by federal law.

(2) The Hearing Instrument Specialists Practice Act does not change the scope of practice of a licensed audiologist.

(3) The Hearing Instrument Specialists Practice Act is not intended to prevent any person from engaging in the practice of measuring human hearing for the purpose of selection of hearing instruments if such person or organization employing such person does not sell hearing instruments or the accessories thereto.

(4) The Hearing Instrument Specialists Practice Act does not apply to a person who is a physician or audiologist licensed to practice in this state, except that such physician or audiologist shall not delegate the authority to fit and dispense hearing instruments unless the person to whom the authority is delegated is licensed as a hearing instrument specialist under the act.

Laws 1969, c. 767, § 4, p. 2905;

Laws 1986, LB 701, § 4;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 150;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-4704;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 574;

Laws 2009, LB195, § 28;

Laws 2025, LB332, § 18.